Idaho, session 2025, H0198.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 6-2602, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
6-2602. PURPOSE. The legislature finds that some residential prop-
erties are being contaminated with hazardous chemical residues created by
the manufacture of clandestine drugs. Innocent members of the public may be


harmed when they are exposed to chemical residues if the residential prop-
erties are not decontaminated prior to any subsequent rental, sale or use of
the properties. The purpose of this chapter is to protect the public health,
safety and welfare by authorizing the department of health and welfare to
establish establishing a program providing a process and standards for the
cleanup of clandestine drug laboratories.
SECTION 2. That Section 6-2603, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
6-2603. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter, unless the context oth-
erwise requires:
(1) "Clandestine drug laboratory" means the areas where controlled
substances or their immediate precursors, as those terms are defined in sec-
tion 37-2701, Idaho Code, have been, or were attempted to be, manufactured,
processed, cooked, disposed of or stored, and all proximate areas that are
likely to be contaminated as a result of such manufacturing, processing,
cooking, disposing or storing.
(2) "Department" means the Idaho department of health and welfare.
(3) "Law enforcement agency" means any policing agency of the state or
of any political subdivision of the state.
(4) "Qualified industrial hygienist" means an individual who is:
(a) Certified in comprehensive practice by the American board of indus-
trial hygiene; or
(b) Registered as a member of the association of professional indus-
trial hygienists.
(4) (5) "Residential property" means any building or structure to be
primarily occupied by people, either as a dwelling or as a business, includ-
ing a storage facility, mobile home, manufactured home or recreational vehi-
cle that may be sold, leased or rented for any length of time. "Residential
property" does not include any water system, sewer system, land or water out-
side of a building or structure.
(5) (6) "Residential property owner" means the person holding record
title to residential property, as defined in this section.
SECTION 3. That Section 6-2604, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 4. That Chapter 26, Title 6, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 6-2604, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
6-2604. DEPARTMENT RESPONSIBILITY. (1) Upon notification by a law en-
forcement agency or a property owner who voluntarily reports a property, the
department shall place the property on the clandestine drug laboratory site
property list.
(2) When a property is determined by a qualified industrial hygienist
to meet the cleanup standard in this chapter or the property owner submits
documentation establishing that the property has been fully and lawfully de-
molished, the department shall issue the property owner a dated certificate
of delisting.


SECTION 5. That Section 6-2605, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
6-2605. LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY RESPONSIBILITY. Following the adop-
tion of rules pursuant to section 6-2604, Idaho Code, and using a format
established by the department, a A law enforcement agency, upon locating
chemicals, equipment, supplies or immediate precursors indicative of a
clandestine drug laboratory on a residential property, shall notify the
residential property owner and the department within seventy-two (72) hours
using the department-approved form and shall post a sign on the property.
SECTION 6. That Section 6-2606, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
6-2606. RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY OWNER CLEANUP RESPONSIBILITY. (1) Ex-
cept as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, and pursuant to
rules adopted as provided in this chapter, upon notification to a residen-
tial property owner by a law enforcement agency that chemicals, equipment,
supplies or immediate precursors indicative of a clandestine drug labora-
tory have been located on the owner's residential property, the residential
property owner shall meet the cleanup standards established by the de-
partment. The residential property shall remain vacant from the time the
residential property owner is notified, in accordance with rules adopted as
provided in this chapter, of the clandestine drug laboratory until such time
as the residential property owner has received a certificate issued by the
department evidencing that the cleanup standards have been met.
(2) A residential property owner may, at his or her option, elect to de-
molish the residential property instead of meeting the cleanup standards es-
tablished by the department.
SECTION 7. That Section 6-2607, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
6-2607. RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY OWNER IMMUNITY. Once a residential prop-
erty meets the cleanup standards established by the department pursuant to
rules adopted as provided in this chapter, the residential property owner
and any representative or agent of the residential property owner shall be
immune from civil actions involving health claims brought by any future
owner, renter or other person who occupies the residential property, and by
any neighbor of such residential property, where the alleged cause of injury
or loss is based upon the use of the residential property for the purposes of
a clandestine drug laboratory, provided however, that such immunity shall
not apply to any person alleged to have produced the clandestine drugs.
SECTION 8. That Section 6-2608, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
6-2608. VOLUNTARY COMPLIANCE. Any residential property owner who
chooses to voluntarily and successfully accomplish the cleanup standards
established by the department pursuant to rules adopted as provided in this
chapter, whether or not such owner was notified by a law enforcement agency,


shall be afforded the protections from civil actions provided in section
6-2607, Idaho Code.
SECTION 9. That Chapter 26, Title 6, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 6-2609, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
6-2609. CLEARANCE SAMPLING REQUIREMENTS. (1) A qualified industrial
hygienist who is independent of the company or entity conducting the cleanup
or analysis shall conduct sampling to verify that cleanup standards have
been met. All sample collection must be conducted pursuant to this section.
(2) Sample locations shall be photographed and show the floor plan of
the property, and such photos shall be included in the requisite final re-
port.
(3) Samples shall be obtained, preserved, and handled under profes-
sional standards for the types of samples and analytical testing to be
conducted under the chain of custody protocol.
(4) Samples shall be analyzed by a laboratory certified by the United
States environmental protection agency or accredited by the American indus-
trial hygiene association laboratory accreditation program for the analyte
being analyzed.
(5) Sampling locations shall be numerically identified, and the num-
bered sampling locations shall be delineated on the floor plan, visible in
photographs, and linked to samples.
(6) Standard three (3) inch by three (3) inch gauze shall be used for
all sampling. The gauze shall be wetted with analytical grade methanol or
isopropanol and each surface wiped at least five (5) times in two (2) perpen-
dicular directions, and the gauze shall be turned onto itself throughout the
wiping process.
(7) After sampling, the sample shall be placed in a new, clean sample
container and sealed with a teflon-lined lid. The sample container shall be
labeled with the site or project identification number, date, time, and sam-
ple location and shall be handled by professional standards and conducted
under the chain of custody protocol.
(8) Discrete sampling shall be used in areas expected to have the high-
est levels of contamination as identified on the department-approved form.
A ten (10) centimeter by ten (10) centimeter area shall be sampled from non-
porous surfaces such as floors, walls, appliances, sinks, or countertops in
each room. The sample area shall be composed of no fewer than three (3) dis-
crete samples.
(9) All other rooms of the property with the lowest levels of contamina-
tion shall be sampled using one (1) discrete sample per room.
(10) A ten (10) centimeter by ten (10) centimeter area shall be sampled
from the ventilation system in a location to be determined by the qualified
industrial hygienist.
SECTION 10. That Chapter 26, Title 6, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 6-2610, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:


6-2610. CLEANUP STANDARDS. The following cleanup standards must be
met:
(1) A level of methamphetamine that does not exceed a concentration of
one-tenth (0.1) of a microgram per one hundred (100) square centimeters as
demonstrated by clearance sampling conducted by a qualified industrial hy-
gienist.
(2) If a porous surface has a level of methamphetamine that does not
exceed a concentration of five-tenths (0.5) of a microgram per one hundred
(100) square centimeters as demonstrated by clearance sampling conducted by
a qualified industrial hygienist, an adequate coating or sealant appropri-
ate to the material may be used as a method to meet the cleanup standard.
(3) Standards may be established for the cleanup of other controlled
substances found in clandestine drug laboratories on an individual basis,
based on an inventory of chemicals found, and after consultation with the de-
partment, the property owner, law enforcement, and a qualified industrial
hygienist.
SECTION 11. That Chapter 26, Title 6, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 6-2611, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
6-2611. REPORTING REQUIREMENTS. (1) For a property to be delisted, the
property owner must provide the department with an original or certified
copy of the final report that includes the following from a qualified indus-
trial hygienist:
(a) The property description, including physical street address, city,
zip code, legal description, ownership, and number and type of struc-
tures present;
(b) Documentation of sampling procedures and analytical results from a
laboratory as specified in this chapter; and
(c) A qualified industrial hygienist statement of qualifications, in-
cluding professional certification or documentation, and a signed cer-
tification stating: "I certify that the cleanup standard established
by Idaho Code has been met as evidenced by testing I conducted."
(2) If the property owner chooses to demolish the property, documenta-
tion shall be provided to the department showing that the structure was com-
pletely and lawfully demolished and disposed of complying with local, state,
and federal laws and regulations.
SECTION 12. That Section 56-1007, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-1007. COLLECTION OF FEES FOR SERVICES. The department of health and
welfare is hereby authorized to charge and collect reasonable fees, estab-
lished by rule, for any service rendered by the department. The fee may be
determined by a sliding scale according to income or available assets. The
department is hereby authorized to require information concerning the total
income and assets of each person receiving services in order to determine the
amount of the fee to be charged. The state laboratory is authorized to charge
testing fees at market rates that do not disadvantage entities offering sim-
ilar services.


SECTION 13. That Title 56, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated
as Chapter 22, Title 56, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 22
DRINKING WATER LABORATORY CERTIFICATION PROGRAM
56-2201. SHORT TITLE. This chapter shall be known and may be cited as
the "Drinking Water Laboratory Certification Program."
56-2202. APPLICATION FOR CERTIFICATION. (1) An application for drink-
ing water certification, listing methods approved by the department of envi-
ronmental quality, shall be submitted annually by laboratories seeking cer-
tification on a form approved by the department of health and welfare.
(2) Applications for renewal and supporting documentation requested by
the department of health and welfare must be received by the department at
least thirty (30) days before the current certificate expires.
(3) A laboratory seeking to change methods or to add analytes prior to
annual reapplication shall submit an amended application and provide sup-
porting documentation requested by the department of health and welfare.
Laboratories submitting an amended application shall be subject to an addi-
tional base fee charge.
(4) All certifications shall be valid for one (1) year from the date of
issuance.
56-2203. CERTIFICATION FEES. (1) Laboratories requesting chemistry
certification shall be charged a base fee of one hundred dollars ($100) per
discipline and twenty dollars ($20.00) per analyte per method.
(2) Laboratories requesting microbiology certification shall be
charged a fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150).
(3) Out-of-state laboratories requesting chemistry certification
shall be charged a base fee of two hundred dollars ($200) per discipline and
twenty dollars ($20.00) per analyte per method.
(4) Out-of-state laboratories requesting microbiology certification
shall be charged a fee of three hundred dollars ($300).
(5) New laboratories requesting certification will be charged a non-
refundable application fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per disci-
pline listed on the completed application form.
56-2204. CERTIFICATION OVERSIGHT AND REQUIREMENTS. (1) Qualified
representatives of the department of health and welfare are authorized to
audit the premises and operations of all certified laboratories to determine
the adequacy of the laboratory to perform drinking water compliance testing.
On-site audits shall occur a minimum of every three (3) years or more fre-
quently at the discretion of the department. Departmental representatives
shall issue a written report of audit findings, list items requiring a lab-
oratory response, and specify the response time frame required to maintain
certification.
(2) Test results shall be submitted in a format approved by the depart-
ment of environmental quality and shall be reported to the department of en-
vironmental quality, or the department's designee, no later than ten (10)


business days after the completion of testing or upon receipt of results from
subcontracted laboratories.
(3) As soon as feasible, a laboratory shall notify the department of
environmental quality, or the department's designee, of any nitrate and ni-
trate level exceeding the current maximum contaminant level. Notification
shall also be made for any other regulated chemical or radiological contam-
inant that exceeds four (4) times the maximum contaminant level. Notifica-
tion requirements apply to any samples subcontracted to another laboratory.
(4) A laboratory shall notify the department of environmental quality,
or the department's designee, of any total coliform positive result by the
end of the day, unless the positive result is obtained after the department
of environmental quality is closed and the department of environmental qual-
ity does not have either an after-hours phone line or an alternative notifi-
cation procedure, in which case the laboratory shall notify the department
of environmental quality before the end of the next business day.
SECTION 14. That Title 56, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated
as Chapter 23, Title 56, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 23
QUALITY ASSURANCE FOR CLINICAL LABORATORIES
56-2301. SHORT TITLE. This chapter shall be known and may be cited as
the "Quality Assurance for Clinical Laboratories."
56-2302. REGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS. (1) A clinical laboratory shall
register with the department of health and welfare on a department form prior
to accepting specimens for testing.
(2) Registered clinical laboratories shall submit a completed regis-
tration form every two (2) years and indicate any changes in laboratory oper-
ations.
(3) To be registered, a clinical laboratory shall submit evidence of
certification from one (1) of the following:
(a) The centers for medicare and medicaid services (CMS) clinical labo-
ratory improvement amendments certification program;
(b) An agency approved by CMS as an accreditation program; or
(c) Other certification programs approved by the department of health
and welfare.
(4) The following laboratories and facilities are excluded from com-
pliance with this chapter:
(a) Teaching, research, forensic, and pre-employment drug screening
laboratories, if test results are not used for diagnosis or treatment;
(b) Prosthetic dental laboratories; and
(c) Facilities performing skin testing solely for the detection of al-
lergies and sensitivities.
56-2303. DEPARTMENT INSPECTIONS. Qualified representatives of the
department of health and welfare are authorized to inspect any registered
clinical laboratory to determine the adequacy of the supervision, staffing,
and quality assurance program.


56-2304. GENERAL REQUIREMENTS. (1) A clinical laboratory shall have
adequate space, equipment, and supplies to perform the services offered by
the laboratory with accuracy, precision, and safety.
(2) Practitioners legally authorized to diagnose, treat, and prescribe
are authorized to order both waived and nonwaived tests and receive results.
Laboratory directors are authorized to order the waived tests listed on an
approved registration form and receive results.
(3) Clinical laboratories shall satisfactorily participate in profi-
ciency testing programs approved by the department of health and welfare and
ensure all proficiency testing results are available to the department.
(4) Clinical laboratories shall:
(a) Identify the person responsible for performing a procedure;
(b) Maintain testing records for at least two (2) years and ensure that
test reports are readily accessible upon request; and
(c) Identify specimens referred to other certified laboratories and
identify the reference laboratory by name and address.
SECTION 15. The rules contained in IDAPA 16.02.06, Idaho Department
of Health and Welfare, relating to Quality Assurance for Clinical Labo-
ratories, shall be null, void, and of no force and effect on and after the
effective date of this act.
SECTION 16. The rules contained in IDAPA 16.02.13, Idaho Department
of Health and Welfare, relating to State of Idaho Drinking Water Laboratory
Certification Program, shall be null, void, and of no force and effect on and
after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 17. The rules contained in IDAPA 16.02.24, Idaho Department of
Health and Welfare, relating to Clandestine Drug Laboratory Cleanup, shall
be null, void, and of no force and effect on and after the effective date of
this act.
SECTION 18. The rules contained in IDAPA 16.02.25, Idaho Department of
Health and Welfare, relating to State Laboratory Fees, shall be null, void,
and of no force and effect on and after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 19. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.